Utah statutes.
23-19-34.7.   Nonresident falconry meet license.
(1)  A nonresident 14 years of age or older may participate in a falconry meet
in this state upon payment of a fee prescribed by the Wildlife Board.
(2)  A nonresident falconry meet license shall be valid only for five
consecutive days, the dates to be designated on the license.  The holder of
the license may engage in the sport of falconry on nongame wildlife species
and small game species, during the specified five-day period.
